Ohio, session 136, SB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4501.21 be amended and section 4
4503.59 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 4501.21. (A) There is hereby created in the state 6
treasury the license plate contribution fund. The fund shall 7
consist of all contributions for specialty license plates paid 8
by motor vehicle registrants and collected by the registrar of 9
motor vehicles pursuant to the Revised Code sections referenced 10
in division (B) of this section. 11
(B) The registrar shall pay the contributions the 12
registrar collects in the fund as follows: 13
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 14
pursuant to section 4503.491 of the Revised Code to the breast 15
cancer fund of Ohio, which shall use that money only to pay for 16
programs that provide assistance and education to Ohio breast 17
cancer patients and that improve access for such patients to 18
quality health care and clinical trials and shall not use any of 19

S. B. No. 221 Page 2
As Introduced
the money for abortion information, counseling, services, or 20
other abortion-related activities. 21
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 22
receives pursuant to section 4503.492 of the Revised Code to the 23
organization cancer support community central Ohio, which shall 24
deposit the money into the Sheryl L. Kraner Fund of that 25
organization. Cancer support community central Ohio shall expend 26
the money it receives pursuant to this division only in the same 27
manner and for the same purposes as that organization expends 28
other money in that fund. 29
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 30
pursuant to section 4503.493 of the Revised Code to the autism 31
society of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for programs 32
and autism awareness efforts throughout the state. 33
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 34
receives pursuant to section 4503.494 of the Revised Code to the 35
national multiple sclerosis society for distribution in equal 36
amounts to the northwestern Ohio, Ohio buckeye, and Ohio valley 37
chapters of the national multiple sclerosis society. These 38
chapters shall use the money they receive under this section to 39
assist in paying the expenses they incur in providing services 40
directly to their clients. 41
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 42
receives pursuant to section 4503.495 of the Revised Code to the 43
national pancreatic cancer foundation, which shall use the money 44
it receives under this section to assist those who have 45
pancreatic cancer and their families. 46
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 47
receives pursuant to section 4503.496 of the Revised Code to the 48

S. B. No. 221 Page 3
As Introduced
Ohio sickle cell and health association, which shall use the 49
contributions to help support educational, clinical, and social 50
support services for adults who have sickle cell disease. 51
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 52
receives pursuant to section 4503.497 of the Revised Code to the 53
St. Baldrick's foundation, which shall use the contributions for 54
its research and other programs. 55
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 56
receives pursuant to section 4503.498 of the Revised Code to 57
special olympics Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions 58
for its programs, charitable efforts, and other activities. 59
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 60
receives pursuant to section 4503.499 of the Revised Code to the 61
children's glioma cancer foundation, which shall use the 62
contributions for its research and other programs. 63
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 64
receives pursuant to section 4503.4910 of the Revised Code to 65
the KylerStrong foundation, which shall use the contributions to 66
raise awareness of brain cancer caused by diffuse intrinsic 67
pontine glioma and to fund research for the cure of such cancer. 68
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 69
receives pursuant to section 4503.4911 of the Revised Code to 70
the research institution for childhood cancer at nationwide 71
children's hospital, which shall use the contributions to fund 72
research for the cure of childhood cancers. 73
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 74
receives pursuant to section 4503.4912 of the Revised Code to 75
the Ben Morrison memorial fund, which shall use the 76
contributions for scholarships and other programs that support 77

S. B. No. 221 Page 4
As Introduced
mental health. 78
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 79
receives pursuant to section 4503.50 of the Revised Code to the 80
future farmers of America foundation, which shall deposit the 81
contributions into its general account to be used for 82
educational and scholarship purposes of the future farmers of 83
America foundation. 84
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 85
receives pursuant to section 4503.501 of the Revised Code to the 86
4-H youth development program of the Ohio state university 87
extension program, which shall use those contributions to pay 88
the expenses it incurs in conducting its educational activities. 89
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 90
pursuant to section 4503.502 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 91
cattlemen's foundation, which shall use those contributions for 92
scholarships and other educational activities. 93
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 94
pursuant to section 4503.505 of the Revised Code to the 95
organization Ohio region phi theta kappa, which shall use those 96
contributions for scholarships for students who are members of 97
that organization. 98
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 99
receives pursuant to section 4503.506 of the Revised Code to 100
Ohio demolay, which shall use the contributions for 101
scholarships, educational programs, and any other programs or 102
events the organization holds or sponsors in this state. 103
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 104
pursuant to section 4503.507 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 105
aerospace institute, which shall use those contributions to 106

S. B. No. 221 Page 5
As Introduced
facilitate student internships in aerospace and educational 107
programming. 108
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 109
pursuant to section 4503.508 of the Revised Code to the 110
organization bottoms up diaper drive to provide funding for that 111
organization for collecting and delivering diapers to parents in 112
need. 113
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 114
receives pursuant to section 4503.509 of the Revised Code to a 115
kid again, incorporated for distribution in equal amounts to the 116
Ohio chapters of a kid again. 117
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 118
receives pursuant to section 4503.51 of the Revised Code to the 119
university or college whose name or marking or design appears on 120
collegiate license plates that are issued to a person under that 121
section. A university or college that receives contributions 122
from the fund shall deposit the contributions into its general 123
scholarship fund. 124
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 125
receives pursuant to section 4503.512 of the Revised Code to the 126
Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega 127
chapter in Ohio. The Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated 128
Delta Theta Omega chapter shall use the contributions for the 129
development and perpetuation of scholarship, leadership, 130
citizenship, fidelity, and brotherhood among men and youth in 131
this state. 132
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 133
receives pursuant to section 4503.514 of the Revised Code to the 134
university of Notre Dame in South Bend, Indiana, for purposes of 135

S. B. No. 221 Page 6
As Introduced
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 136
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 137
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 138
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 139
university of Notre Dame to effectuate the distribution of such 140
funds as provided in this section. 141
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 142
receives pursuant to section 4503.516 of the Revised Code to 143
Marshall university in Huntington, West Virginia, for purposes 144
of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who 145
attend the university. The university shall not use any of the 146
funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship 147
program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements 148
with Marshall university to effectuate the distribution of such 149
funds as provided in this section. 150
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 151
receives pursuant to section 4503.517 of the Revised Code to the 152
university of Alabama in Tuscaloosa, Alabama, for purposes of 153
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 154
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 155
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 156
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 157
university of Alabama to effectuate the distribution of such 158
funds as provided in this section. 159
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 160
receives pursuant to section 4503.518 of the Revised Code to the 161
Nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the 162
contributions for the "On Our Sleeves" campaign. 163
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 164
receives pursuant to section 4503.519 of the Revised Code 165

S. B. No. 221 Page 7
As Introduced
equally to NAMI Ohio (national alliance on mental illness of 166
Ohio), Ohio peer recovery organizations, and OCAAR (Ohio citizen 167
advocates for addiction recovery). 168
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 169
receives pursuant to section 4503.520 of the Revised Code to 170
Purdue university in West Lafayette, Indiana, for purposes of 171
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 172
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 173
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 174
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with 175
Purdue university to effectuate the distribution of such funds 176
as provided in this section. 177
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 178
receives pursuant to section 4503.521 of the Revised Code to the 179
Ohio bicycle federation to assist that organization in paying 180
for the educational programs it sponsors in support of Ohio 181
cyclists of all ages. 182
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 183
receives pursuant to section 4503.522 of the Revised Code to the 184
"friends of Perry's victory and international peace memorial, 185
incorporated," a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws 186
of this state, to assist that organization in paying the 187
expenses it incurs in sponsoring or holding charitable, 188
educational, and cultural events at the monument. 189
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 190
receives pursuant to section 4503.523 of the Revised Code to the 191
fairport lights foundation, which shall use the money to pay for 192
the restoration, maintenance, and preservation of the 193
lighthouses of fairport harbor. 194

S. B. No. 221 Page 8
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 195
receives pursuant to section 4503.524 of the Revised Code to the 196
Massillon tiger football booster club, which shall use the 197
contributions only to promote and support the football team of 198
Washington high school of the Massillon city school district. 199
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 200
receives pursuant to section 4503.525 of the Revised Code to the 201
United States power squadron district seven which shall annually 202
distribute the contributions in equal amounts to all United 203
States power squadrons located in the state. Each power squadron 204
district shall use the money it receives under this section to 205
pay for the educational boating programs each district holds or 206
sponsors within this state. 207
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 208
receives pursuant to section 4503.526 of the Revised Code to the 209
Ohio district Kiwanis foundation of the Ohio district of Kiwanis 210
international, which shall use the money it receives under this 211
section to pay the costs of its educational and humanitarian 212
activities. 213
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 214
receives pursuant to section 4503.528 of the Revised Code to the 215
Ohio children's alliance, which shall use the money it receives 216
under this section to pay the expenses it incurs in advancing 217
its mission of sustainably improving the provision of services 218
to children, young adults, and families in this state. 219
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 220
receives pursuant to section 4503.529 of the Revised Code to the 221
Ohio nurses foundation. The foundation shall use the money it 222
receives under this section to provide educational scholarships 223
to assist individuals who aspire to join the nursing profession, 224

S. B. No. 221 Page 9
As Introduced
to assist nurses in the nursing profession who seek to advance 225
their education, and to support persons conducting nursing 226
research concerning the evidence-based practice of nursing and 227
the improvement of patient outcomes. 228
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 229
receives pursuant to section 4503.53 of the Revised Code to the 230
Indiana Kentucky Ohio regional council of carpenters. The 231
council shall use the money it receives to assist its members 232
who are experiencing financial hardship. 233
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 234
receives pursuant to section 4503.531 of the Revised Code to the 235
thank you foundation, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation 236
organized under the laws of this state, to assist that 237
organization in paying for the charitable activities and 238
programs it sponsors in support of United States military 239
personnel, veterans, and their families. 240
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 241
receives pursuant to section 4503.532 of the Revised Code to the 242
Ohio history connection, which shall use the contributions for 243
the benefit of the Paul Laurence Dunbar house. 244
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 245
receives pursuant to section 4503.533 of the Revised Code to the 246
nonprofit organization Ohio conference of teamsters and industry 247
health and welfare fund, which shall use the contributions to 248
further the nonprofit's mission. 249
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 250
receives pursuant to section 4503.534 of the Revised Code to the 251
disabled American veterans department of Ohio, to be used for 252
programs that serve disabled American veterans and their 253

S. B. No. 221 Page 10
As Introduced
families. 254
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 255
receives pursuant to section 4503.536 of the Revised Code to 256
save a warrior, incorporated, which shall use the contributions 257
to prevent suicide by active members of the armed forces of the 258
United States, veterans of those armed forces, and first 259
responders. 260
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 261
receives pursuant to section 4503.542 of the Revised Code to the 262
Ohio craft brewers association. 263
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 264
receives pursuant to section 4503.541 of the Revised Code to 265
Dolly Parton's imagination library of Ohio. The library shall 266
use the money it receives under this section for operational 267
costs, including the distribution of books. 268
The registrar shall pay the contributions that are paid to 269
the registrar pursuant to section 4503.545 of the Revised Code 270
to the national rifle association foundation, which shall use 271
the money to pay the costs of the educational activities and 272
programs the foundation holds or sponsors in this state. 273
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 274
receives pursuant to section 4503.55 of the Revised Code to the 275
pro football hall of fame, which shall deposit the contributions 276
into a special bank account that it establishes and which shall 277
be separate and distinct from any other account the pro football 278
hall of fame maintains, to be used exclusively for the purpose 279
of promoting the pro football hall of fame as a travel 280
destination. 281
The registrar shall pay to the Ohio pet fund the 282

S. B. No. 221 Page 11
As Introduced
contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 283
4503.551 of the Revised Code and any other money from any other 284
source, including donations, gifts, and grants, that is 285
designated by the source to be paid to the Ohio pet fund. The 286
Ohio pet fund shall use the moneys it receives under this 287
section to support programs for the sterilization of dogs and 288
cats and for educational programs concerning the proper 289
veterinary care of those animals, and for expenses of the Ohio 290
pet fund that are reasonably necessary for it to obtain and 291
maintain its tax-exempt status and to perform its duties. 292
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 293
receives pursuant to section 4503.552 of the Revised Code to the 294
rock and roll hall of fame and museum, incorporated. 295
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 296
receives pursuant to section 4503.553 of the Revised Code to the 297
Ohio coalition for animals, incorporated, a nonprofit 298
corporation. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, 299
the coalition shall distribute the money to its members, and the 300
members shall use the money only to pay for educational, 301
charitable, and other programs of each coalition member that 302
provide care for unwanted, abused, and neglected horses. The 303
Ohio coalition for animals may use a portion of the money to pay 304
for reasonable marketing costs incurred in the design and 305
promotion of the license plate and for administrative costs 306
incurred in the disbursement and management of funds received 307
under this section. 308
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 309
receives pursuant to section 4503.554 of the Revised Code to the 310
Ohio state council of the knights of Columbus, which shall use 311
the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and 312

S. B. No. 221 Page 12
As Introduced
programs. 313
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 314
receives pursuant to section 4503.555 of the Revised Code to the 315
western reserve historical society, which shall use the 316
contributions to fund the Crawford auto aviation museum. 317
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 318
receives pursuant to section 4503.556 of the Revised Code to the 319
Erica J. Holloman foundation, inc., for the awareness of triple 320
negative breast cancer. The foundation shall use the 321
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 322
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 323
receives pursuant to section 4503.557 of the Revised Code to the 324
central Ohio chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities, 325
which shall distribute the contribution to the chapter of the 326
Ronald McDonald house charities in whose geographic territory 327
the person who paid the contribution resides. 328
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 329
receives pursuant to section 4503.559 of the Revised Code to 330
playhouse square, located in Cleveland, Ohio, which shall use 331
the contributions to further its mission of presenting and 332
producing a wide variety of quality performing arts, advancing 333
arts education, and creating a superior destination for 334
entertainment, business, and residential living. 335
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 336
receives pursuant to section 4503.561 of the Revised Code to the 337
state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., which shall 338
deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it 339
establishes. The special bank account shall be separate and 340
distinct from any other account the state of Ohio chapter of 341

S. B. No. 221 Page 13
As Introduced
ducks unlimited, inc., maintains and shall be used exclusively 342
for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, restoring, and 343
managing wetlands and conserving wildlife habitat. The state of 344
Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., annually shall notify the 345
registrar in writing of the name, address, and account to which 346
such payments are to be made. 347
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 348
receives pursuant to section 4503.562 of the Revised Code to the 349
Mahoning river consortium, which shall use the money to pay the 350
expenses it incurs in restoring and maintaining the Mahoning 351
river watershed. 352
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 353
receives pursuant to section 4503.564 of the Revised Code to the 354
Glen Helen association to pay expenses related to the Glen Helen 355
nature preserve. 356
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 357
receives pursuant to section 4503.565 of the Revised Code to the 358
conservancy for Cuyahoga valley national park, which shall use 359
the money in support of the park. 360
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 361
receives pursuant to section 4503.566 of the Revised Code to the 362
Ottawa national wildlife refuge, which shall use the 363
contributions for wildlife preservation purposes. 364
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 365
receives pursuant to section 4503.567 of the Revised Code to the 366
girls on the run of Franklin county, inc., which shall use the 367
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 368
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 369
receives pursuant to section 4503.569 of the Revised Code to the 370

S. B. No. 221 Page 14
As Introduced
Ohio bird sanctuary, located in Mansfield, Ohio, which shall use 371
the contributions for purposes of its operations, bird care and 372
rehabilitation, and educational programs. 373
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 374
receives pursuant to section 4503.576 of the Revised Code to the 375
Ohio state beekeepers association, which shall use those 376
contributions to promote beekeeping, provide educational 377
information about beekeeping, and to support other state and 378
local beekeeping programs. 379
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 380
receives pursuant to section 4503.577 of the Revised Code to the 381
national aviation hall of fame, which shall use the 382
contributions to fulfill its mission of honoring aerospace 383
legends to inspire future leaders. 384
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 385
receives pursuant to section 4503.578 of the Revised Code to 386
keep Ohio beautiful, incorporated, which shall use the 387
contributions towards its mission of empowering Ohio communities 388
to take greater responsibility for improving the local 389
environment through litter prevention, beautification, community 390
greening, waste reduction, and recycling. 391
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 392
receives pursuant to section 4503.579 of the Revised Code to the 393
national council of negro women, incorporated, which shall use 394
the contributions for educational purposes. 395
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 396
receives pursuant to section 4503.581 of the Revised Code to the 397
Ohio past detachment commander's club, inc., which shall use the 398
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 399

S. B. No. 221 Page 15
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 400
receives pursuant to section 4503.582 of the Revised Code to the 401
progressive animal welfare society adoption center, inc., which 402
shall use the contributions to support the activities of the 403
center. 404
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 405
receives pursuant to section 4503.583 of the Revised Code to the 406
American legion, department of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 407
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 408
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 409
receives pursuant to section 4503.584 of the Revised Code to the 410
Ohio natural energy foundation to fund scholarships for students 411
pursuing careers in the oil and natural gas industry. 412
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 413
receives pursuant to section 4503.585 of the Revised Code to the 414
Terrace Park recreation committee, inc. to offer scholarships to 415
young athletes of, and maintain athletic facilities in, the 416
municipal corporation of Terrace Park. 417
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 418
receives pursuant to section 4503.586 of the Revised Code to the 419
Ohio mountain bike alliance. 420
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 421
receives pursuant to section 4503.588 of the Revised Code to the 422
Ohio grange patrons of husbandry foundation, which shall use the 423
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 424
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 425
receives pursuant to section 4503.59 of the Revised Code to 426
equality Ohio, which shall use the contributions to support the 427
activities of the organization and advancing its mission, 428

S. B. No. 221 Page 16
As Introduced
including lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and others 429
(LGBTQ+) visibility and education. 430
The registrar shall pay to a sports commission created 431
pursuant to section 4503.591 of the Revised Code each 432
contribution the registrar receives under that section that an 433
applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a 434
professional sports team located in the county of that sports 435
commission and that is participating in the license plate 436
program pursuant to division (E) of that section, irrespective 437
of the county of residence of an applicant. 438
The registrar shall pay to a community charity each 439
contribution the registrar receives under section 4503.591 of 440
the Revised Code that an applicant pays to obtain license plates 441
that bear the logo of a professional sports team that is 442
participating in the license plate program pursuant to division 443
(G) of that section. 444
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 445
receives pursuant to section 4503.592 of the Revised Code to 446
pollinator partnership's monarch wings across Ohio program, 447
which shall use the contributions for the protection and 448
preservation of the monarch butterfly and pollinator corridor in 449
Ohio and for educational programs. 450
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 451
receives pursuant to section 4503.594 of the Revised Code to 452
pelotonia, which shall use the contributions for the purpose of 453
supporting cancer research. 454
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 455
receives pursuant to section 4503.595 of the Revised Code to the 456
Stan Hywet hall and gardens. 457

S. B. No. 221 Page 17
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 458
receives pursuant to section 4503.596 of the Revised Code to the 459
Cuyahoga valley scenic railroad. 460
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 461
receives pursuant to section 4503.597 of the Revised Code to the 462
Circleville pumpkin show, incorporated, which shall use the 463
contributions to promote good will surrounding the Circleville 464
pumpkin show as a nonprofit annual event. 465
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 466
receives pursuant to section 4503.598 of the Revised Code 467
equally to the Jackson local schools foundation and the Jackson 468
high school alumni association. The foundation and alumni 469
association shall use the contributions for the foundation's and 470
alumni association's purposes. 471
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 472
receives pursuant to section 4503.67 of the Revised Code to the 473
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 474
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 475
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 476
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 477
receives pursuant to section 4503.68 of the Revised Code to the 478
girl scouts of Ohio's heartland. The girl scouts of Ohio's 479
heartland shall distribute all contributions in an equitable 480
manner throughout the state to regional councils of the girl 481
scouts. 482
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 483
receives pursuant to section 4503.69 of the Revised Code to the 484
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 485
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 486

S. B. No. 221 Page 18
As Introduced
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 487
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 488
receives pursuant to section 4503.70 of the Revised Code to the 489
charitable foundation of the grand lodge of Ohio, f. & a. m., 490
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 491
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 492
receives pursuant to section 4503.701 of the Revised Code to the 493
Prince Hall grand lodge of free and accepted masons of Ohio, 494
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 495
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 496
receives pursuant to section 4503.702 of the Revised Code to the 497
Ohio Association of the Improved Benevolent and Protective Order 498
of the Elks of the World, which shall use the funds for 499
charitable purposes. 500
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 501
receives pursuant to section 4503.703 of the Revised Code to the 502
Ohio state moose association. 503
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 504
receives pursuant to section 4503.704 of the Revised Code to the 505
Antioch shrine foundation located in the municipal corporation 506
of Dayton. 507
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 508
receives pursuant to section 4503.71 of the Revised Code to the 509
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 510
deposit the fees into its general account to be used for 511
purposes of the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated. 512
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 513
receives pursuant to section 4503.711 of the Revised Code to the 514
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 515

S. B. No. 221 Page 19
As Introduced
deposit the contributions into an account that it creates to be 516
used for the purpose of advancing and protecting the law 517
enforcement profession, promoting improved law enforcement 518
methods, and teaching respect for law and order. 519
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 520
pursuant to section 4503.712 of the Revised Code to Ohio 521
concerns of police survivors, which shall use those 522
contributions to provide whatever assistance may be appropriate 523
to the families of Ohio law enforcement officers who are killed 524
in the line of duty. 525
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 526
pursuant to section 4503.713 of the Revised Code to the greater 527
Cleveland peace officers memorial society, which shall use those 528
contributions to honor law enforcement officers who have died in 529
the line of duty and support its charitable purposes. 530
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 531
pursuant to section 4503.714 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 532
association of chiefs of police. 533
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 534
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.715 of the 535
Revised Code to the community foundation of Ohio's electric 536
cooperatives, which shall use the contributions to recognize and 537
memorialize fallen or injured lineworkers and support their 538
families. 539
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 540
receives pursuant to section 4503.716 of the Revised Code to the 541
fallen timbers battlefield preservation commission, which shall 542
use the contributions to further the mission of the commission. 543
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 544

S. B. No. 221 Page 20
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.72 of the Revised Code to the 545
organization known on March 31, 2003, as the Ohio CASA/GAL 546
association, a private, nonprofit corporation organized under 547
Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code. The Ohio CASA/GAL association 548
shall use these contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in 549
administering a program to secure the proper representation in 550
the courts of this state of abused, neglected, and dependent 551
children, and for the training and supervision of persons 552
participating in that program. 553
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 554
receives pursuant to section 4503.722 of the Revised Code to the 555
Down Syndrome Association of Central Ohio, which shall use the 556
contributions for advocacy purposes throughout the state. 557
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 558
receives pursuant to section 4503.724 of the Revised Code to the 559
Ohio Chapter of the American Foundation for Suicide Prevention, 560
which shall use the contributions for programs, education, and 561
advocacy purposes throughout the state. 562
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 563
receives pursuant to section 4503.726 of the Revised Code to the 564
Ohio suicide prevention foundation, which shall use the 565
contributions for suicide prevention programs, education, and 566
advocacy. 567
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 568
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.725 of the 569
Revised Code to the ALS united Ohio, incorporated, which shall 570
split the contributions between that organization and the ALS 571
association in accordance with any agreement between the two 572
organizations. The contributions shall be used to discover 573
treatments and a cure for ALS, and to serve, advocate for, and 574

S. B. No. 221 Page 21
As Introduced
empower people affected by ALS to live their lives to the 575
fullest. 576
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 577
receives pursuant to section 4503.73 of the Revised Code to 578
Wright B. Flyer, incorporated, which shall deposit the 579
contributions into its general account to be used for purposes 580
of Wright B. Flyer, incorporated. 581
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 582
receives pursuant to section 4503.732 of the Revised Code to the 583
Siegel Shuster society, a nonprofit organization dedicated to 584
commemorating and celebrating the creation of Superman in 585
Cleveland, Ohio. 586
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 587
receives pursuant to section 4503.733 of the Revised Code to the 588
central Ohio chapter of the juvenile diabetes research 589
foundation, which shall distribute the contributions to the 590
chapters of the juvenile diabetes research foundation in whose 591
geographic territory the person who paid the contribution 592
resides. 593
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 594
receives pursuant to section 4503.734 of the Revised Code to the 595
Ohio highway patrol auxiliary foundation, which shall use the 596
contributions to fulfill the foundation's mission of supporting 597
law enforcement education and assistance. 598
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 599
receives pursuant to section 4503.735 of the Revised Code to the 600
heart4seniors/healthcare evolution alert response technology 601
foundation, inc., which shall use the contributions for purposes 602
of the foundation's mission. 603

S. B. No. 221 Page 22
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 604
receives pursuant to section 4503.74 of the Revised Code to the 605
Columbus zoological park association, which shall disburse the 606
moneys to Ohio's major metropolitan zoos, as defined in section 607
4503.74 of the Revised Code, in accordance with a written 608
agreement entered into by the major metropolitan zoos. 609
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 610
receives pursuant to section 4503.741 of the Revised Code to the 611
Ohio house rabbit rescue, which shall use the contributions for 612
its rescue, adoption, and educational programs. 613
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 614
receives pursuant to section 4503.75 of the Revised Code to the 615
rotary foundation, located on March 31, 2003, in Evanston, 616
Illinois, to be placed in a fund known as the permanent fund and 617
used to endow educational and humanitarian programs of the 618
rotary foundation. 619
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 620
receives pursuant to section 4503.751 of the Revised Code to the 621
Ohio association of realtors, which shall deposit the 622
contributions into a property disaster relief fund maintained 623
under the Ohio realtors charitable and education foundation. 624
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 625
receives pursuant to section 4503.752 of the Revised Code to 626
buckeye corvettes, incorporated, which shall use the 627
contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. 628
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 629
receives pursuant to section 4503.754 of the Revised Code to the 630
municipal corporation of Twinsburg. 631
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 632

S. B. No. 221 Page 23
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.755 of the Revised Code to the 633
little brown jug society to assist the society in maintaining, 634
promulgating, and operating the little brown jug as part of 635
Ohio's rich harness racing history. 636
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 637
receives pursuant to section 4503.763 of the Revised Code to the 638
Ohio history connection to be used solely to build, support, and 639
maintain the Ohio battleflag collection within the Ohio history 640
connection. 641
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 642
receives pursuant to section 4503.764 of the Revised Code to the 643
Medina county historical society, which shall use those 644
contributions to distribute between the various historical 645
societies and museums in Medina county. 646
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 647
receives pursuant to section 4503.765 of the Revised Code to the 648
Amaranth grand chapter foundation, which shall use the 649
contributions for communal outreach, charitable service, and 650
scholarship purposes. 651
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 652
receives pursuant to section 4503.766 of the Revised Code to the 653
Ohio society daughters of the American revolution, which shall 654
deposit the contributions into its general account to be used 655
for continuing the organization's endeavors in service, historic 656
preservation, education, and patriotism. 657
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 658
receives pursuant to section 4503.767 of the Revised Code to 659
folds of honor of central Ohio, which shall use the 660
contributions to provide scholarships to spouses and children 661

S. B. No. 221 Page 24
As Introduced
either of disabled veterans or of members of any branch of the 662
armed forces who died during their service. 663
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 664
receives pursuant to section 4503.85 of the Revised Code to the 665
Ohio sea grant college program to be used for Lake Erie area 666
research projects. 667
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 668
receives pursuant to section 4503.851 of the Revised Code to 669
West Virginia university in Morgantown, West Virginia for 670
purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio 671
who attend the university. The university shall not use any of 672
the funds it receives for purposes of administering the 673
scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate 674
agreements with West Virginia university to effectuate the 675
distribution of such funds as provided in this section. 676
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 677
receives pursuant to section 4503.86 of the Revised Code to the 678
Ohio Lincoln highway historic byway, which shall use those 679
contributions solely to promote and support the historical 680
preservation and advertisement of the Lincoln highway in this 681
state. 682
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 683
receives pursuant to section 4503.87 of the Revised Code to the 684
Grove City little league dream field fund, which shall use those 685
contributions solely to build, maintain, and improve youth 686
baseball fields within the municipal corporation of Grove City. 687
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 688
receives pursuant to section 4503.871 of the Revised Code to the 689
Solon city school district. The school district shall use the 690

S. B. No. 221 Page 25
As Introduced
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 691
providing services to the school district's students that assist 692
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 693
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 694
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 695
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 696
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 697
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district 698
superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's 699
discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate 700
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 701
that the school district hires to provide those services. The 702
school district also may use the contributions it receives to 703
pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive 704
training in providing such services to the students of the 705
school district. The school district shall ensure that any 706
charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt 707
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 708
Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the 709
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 710
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 711
receives pursuant to section 4503.872 of the Revised Code to the 712
Canton city school district. The district may use the 713
contributions for student welfare, but shall not use the 714
contributions for any political purpose or to pay salaries of 715
district employees. 716
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 717
receives pursuant to section 4503.873 of the Revised Code to 718
Padua Franciscan high school located in the municipal 719
corporation of Parma. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 720
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 721

S. B. No. 221 Page 26
As Introduced
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 722
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 723
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 724
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 725
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 726
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 727
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 728
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 729
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 730
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 731
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 732
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 733
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 734
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 735
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 736
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 737
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 738
purpose. 739
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 740
receives pursuant to section 4503.874 of the Revised Code to St. 741
Edward high school located in the municipal corporation of 742
Lakewood. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 743
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 744
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 745
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 746
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 747
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 748
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 749
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 750
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 751
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 752

S. B. No. 221 Page 27
As Introduced
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 753
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 754
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 755
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 756
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 757
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 758
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 759
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 760
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 761
purpose. 762
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 763
receives pursuant to section 4503.875 of the Revised Code to 764
Walsh Jesuit high school located in the municipal corporation of 765
Cuyahoga Falls. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 766
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 767
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 768
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 769
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 770
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 771
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 772
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 773
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 774
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 775
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 776
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 777
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 778
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 779
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 780
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 781
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 782
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 783

S. B. No. 221 Page 28
As Introduced
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 784
purpose. 785
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 786
receives pursuant to section 4503.876 of the Revised Code to the 787
North Royalton city school district. The school district shall 788
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 789
in providing services to the school district's students that 790
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 791
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 792
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 793
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 794
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 795
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 796
district superintendent or, in the school district 797
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 798
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 799
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 800
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 801
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 802
district to receive training in providing such services to the 803
students of the school district. The school district shall 804
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 805
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 806
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 807
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 808
purpose. 809
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 810
receives pursuant to section 4503.877 of the Revised Code to the 811
Independence local school district. The school district shall 812
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 813
in providing services to the school district's students that 814

S. B. No. 221 Page 29
As Introduced
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 815
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 816
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 817
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 818
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 819
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 820
district superintendent or, in the school district 821
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 822
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 823
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 824
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 825
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 826
district to receive training in providing such services to the 827
students of the school district. The school district shall 828
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 829
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 830
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 831
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 832
purpose. 833
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 834
receives pursuant to section 4503.878 of the Revised Code to the 835
Cuyahoga Heights local school district. The school district 836
shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it 837
incurs in providing services to the school district's students 838
that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 839
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 840
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 841
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 842
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 843
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 844
district superintendent or, in the school district 845

S. B. No. 221 Page 30
As Introduced
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 846
appropriate school counselors, shall determine any charitable 847
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 848
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 849
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 850
district to receive training in providing such services to the 851
students of the school district. The school district shall 852
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 853
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 854
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 855
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 856
purpose. 857
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 858
receives pursuant to section 4503.879 of the Revised Code to the 859
west technical high school alumni association, which shall use 860
the contributions for activities sponsored by the association. 861
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 862
receives pursuant to section 4503.88 of the Revised Code to the 863
Kenston local school district. The school district shall use the 864
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 865
providing services that assist in developing or maintaining a 866
culture of environmental responsibility and an innovative 867
science, technology, engineering, art, and math (S.T.E.A.M.) 868
curriculum to the school district's students. The school 869
district shall not use the contributions it receives for any 870
other purpose. 871
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 872
receives pursuant to section 4503.881 of the Revised Code to La 873
Salle high school in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. 874
The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for 875

S. B. No. 221 Page 31
As Introduced
any political purpose. 876
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 877
receives pursuant to section 4503.882 of the Revised Code to St. 878
John's Jesuit high school and academy located in the municipal 879
corporation of Toledo. The school shall use the contributions it 880
receives to provide tuition assistance for students attending 881
the school. 882
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 883
receives pursuant to section 4503.883 of the Revised Code to St. 884
Charles preparatory school located in the municipal corporation 885
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 886
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 887
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 888
receives pursuant to section 4503.884 of the Revised Code to 889
Archbishop Moeller high school located in the municipal 890
corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the 891
contributions it receives for any political purpose. 892
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 893
receives pursuant to section 4503.885 of the Revised Code to the 894
Revere schools foundation. The foundation shall use the 895
contributions to promote its mission, including awarding 896
scholarships to honor young people who are meaningfully engaged 897
in their school or community. The foundation shall not use the 898
contributions for any political purpose. 899
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 900
receives pursuant to section 4503.886 of the Revised Code to 901
Stephen T. Badin high school in the municipal corporation of 902
Hamilton. 903
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 904

S. B. No. 221 Page 32
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.887 of the Revised Code to 905
Bishop Hartley high school located in the municipal corporation 906
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 907
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 908
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 909
receives pursuant to section 4503.888 of the Revised Code to St. 910
Vincent-St. Mary high school located in the municipal 911
corporation of Akron. 912
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 913
receives pursuant to section 4503.89 of the Revised Code to the 914
American red cross of greater Columbus on behalf of the Ohio 915
chapters of the American red cross, which shall use the 916
contributions for disaster readiness, preparedness, and response 917
programs on a statewide basis. 918
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 919
receives pursuant to section 4503.891 of the Revised Code to the 920
Ohio lions foundation. The foundation shall use the 921
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 922
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 923
receives pursuant to section 4503.892 of the Revised Code to the 924
Hudson city school district. The school district shall not use 925
the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 926
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 927
receives pursuant to section 4503.893 of the Revised Code to the 928
Harrison Central jr./sr. high school located in the municipal 929
corporation of Cadiz. 930
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 931
receives pursuant to section 4503.894 of the Revised Code to the 932
Blanchester schools foundation for funding student scholarships 933

S. B. No. 221 Page 33
As Introduced
and for funding activities and programs for at-risk students. 934
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 935
receives pursuant to section 4503.895 of the Revised Code to the 936
Lakeside Chautauqua foundation. The foundation shall use the 937
contributions it receives for conservation and preservation of 938
Lake Erie and the surrounding ecosystem. 939
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 940
receives pursuant to section 4503.896 of the Revised Code to the 941
American legion auxiliary department of Ohio. The auxiliary 942
department shall use the contributions it receives to support 943
the American legion, current and former military members, and 944
their families. 945
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 946
receives pursuant to section 4503.899 of the Revised Code to the 947
Cleveland clinic foundation, which shall use the contributions 948
to support Cleveland clinic children's education, research, and 949
patient services. 950
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 951
receives pursuant to section 4503.90 of the Revised Code to the 952
nationwide children's hospital foundation. 953
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 954
receives pursuant to section 4503.901 of the Revised Code to the 955
Ohio association for pupil transportation, which shall use the 956
money to support transportation programs, provide training to 957
school transportation professionals, and support other 958
initiatives for school transportation safety. 959
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 960
receives pursuant to section 4503.902 of the Revised Code to St. 961
Ignatius high school located in the municipal corporation of 962

S. B. No. 221 Page 34
As Introduced
Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 963
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 964
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 965
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 966
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 967
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 968
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 969
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 970
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 971
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 972
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 973
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 974
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 975
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 976
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 977
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 978
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 979
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 980
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 981
purpose. 982
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 983
receives pursuant to section 4503.903 of the Revised Code to the 984
Brecksville-Broadview Heights city school district. The school 985
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 986
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 987
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 988
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 989
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 990
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 991
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 992
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 993

S. B. No. 221 Page 35
As Introduced
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 994
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 995
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 996
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 997
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 998
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 999
district to receive training in providing such services to the 1000
students of the school district. The school district shall 1001
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1002
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1003
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1004
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1005
purpose. 1006
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1007
receives pursuant to section 4503.904 of the Revised Code to the 1008
Chagrin Falls exempted village school district. The school 1009
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 1010
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 1011
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 1012
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 1013
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 1014
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 1015
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 1016
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 1017
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 1018
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 1019
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 1020
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 1021
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 1022
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 1023
district to receive training in providing such services to the 1024

S. B. No. 221 Page 36
As Introduced
students of the school district. The school district shall 1025
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1026
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1027
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1028
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1029
purpose. 1030
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1031
receives pursuant to section 4503.905 of the Revised Code to the 1032
Cuyahoga valley career center. The career center shall use the 1033
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 1034
providing services to the career center's students that assist 1035
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 1036
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1037
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1038
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1039
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1040
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The career center's 1041
superintendent or in the career center's superintendent's 1042
discretion, the school board or appropriate school counselors 1043
shall determine any charitable organizations that the career 1044
center hires to provide those services. The career center also 1045
may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the 1046
faculty of the career center to receive training in providing 1047
such services to the students of the career center. The career 1048
center shall ensure that any charitable organization that is 1049
hired by the career center is exempt from federal income 1050
taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 1051
Code. The career center shall not use the contributions it 1052
receives for any other purpose. 1053
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1054
receives pursuant to section 4503.906 of the Revised Code to the 1055

S. B. No. 221 Page 37
As Introduced
Stow-Munroe Falls city school district. The school district 1056
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1057
purpose. 1058
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1059
receives pursuant to section 4503.907 of the Revised Code to the 1060
Twinsburg city school district. The school district shall not 1061
use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 1062
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1063
receives pursuant to section 4503.908 of the Revised Code to St. 1064
Xavier high school located in Springfield township in Hamilton 1065
county. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1066
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1067
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1068
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1069
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1070
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1071
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1072
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1073
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1074
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1075
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1076
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1077
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1078
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1079
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1080
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1081
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1082
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1083
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1084
purpose. 1085

S. B. No. 221 Page 38
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1086
receives pursuant to section 4503.909 of the Revised Code to the 1087
Grandview Heights city school district, which shall use the 1088
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1089
related services. 1090
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1091
pursuant to section 4503.92 of the Revised Code to support our 1092
troops, incorporated, a national nonprofit corporation, which 1093
shall use those contributions in accordance with its articles of 1094
incorporation and for the benefit of servicemembers of the armed 1095
forces of the United States and their families when they are in 1096
financial need. 1097
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1098
pursuant to section 4503.931 of the Revised Code to healthy New 1099
Albany, which shall use the contributions for its community 1100
programs, events, and other activities. 1101
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1102
receives pursuant to section 4503.932 of the Revised Code to 1103
habitat for humanity of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 1104
contributions for its projects related to building affordable 1105
houses. 1106
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1107
receives pursuant to section 4503.933 of the Revised Code to 1108
Ohio citizens for the arts foundation, which shall use the 1109
contributions for advocacy, education, and professional 1110
development programs. 1111
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1112
receives pursuant to section 4503.934 of the Revised Code to 1113
Ohio society for respiratory care of the American association 1114

S. B. No. 221 Page 39
As Introduced
for respiratory care, incorporated, which shall use the 1115
contributions to benefit the Ohio society for respiratory care 1116
student scholarship fund. 1117
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1118
receives pursuant to section 4503.935 of the Revised Code to 1119
Jesup W. Scott high school's principal activities fund. The high 1120
school shall use the contributions to enhance learning 1121
opportunities for the high school's students. 1122
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1123
receives pursuant to section 4503.936 of the Revised Code to the 1124
Hilliard Davidson baseball club, which shall use the 1125
contributions to support the team. 1126
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1127
receives pursuant to section 4503.94 of the Revised Code to the 1128
Michelle's leading star foundation, which shall use the money 1129
solely to fund the rental, lease, or purchase of the simulated 1130
driving curriculum of the Michelle's leading star foundation by 1131
boards of education of city, exempted village, local, and joint 1132
vocational school districts. 1133
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1134
receives pursuant to section 4503.941 of the Revised Code to the 1135
Ohio chapter international society of arboriculture, which shall 1136
use the money to increase consumer awareness on the importance 1137
of proper tree care and to raise funds for the chapter's 1138
educational efforts. 1139
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1140
pursuant to section 4503.942 of the Revised Code to zero, the 1141
end of prostate cancer, incorporated, a nonprofit organization, 1142
which shall use those contributions to raise awareness of 1143

S. B. No. 221 Page 40
As Introduced
prostate cancer, to support research to end prostate cancer, and 1144
to support prostate cancer patients and their families. 1145
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1146
receives pursuant to section 4503.943 of the Revised Code to the 1147
nonprofit organization weirdo cat lovers of Cleveland, which 1148
shall use the contributions to further its mission of assisting 1149
pet parents with emergency veterinary bills for their feline 1150
companions, providing food and litter to those in economic need, 1151
and controlling feral cat populations through the process of 1152
trap-neuter-return to the community. 1153
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1154
receives pursuant to section 4503.944 of the Revised Code to the 1155
eastern European congress of Ohio, which shall use the 1156
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 1157
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1158
receives pursuant to section 4503.945 of the Revised Code to the 1159
Summit metro parks foundation, which shall use the money in 1160
support of the Summit county metro parks. 1161
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1162
receives pursuant to section 4503.946 of the Revised Code to the 1163
Ohio society, sons of the American revolution, which shall use 1164
the contributions for special projects related to historical 1165
education. 1166
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1167
receives pursuant to section 4503.951 of the Revised Code to the 1168
Cincinnati city school district. 1169
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1170
receives pursuant to section 4503.952 of the Revised Code to 1171
Hawken school located in northeast Ohio. The school shall use 1172

S. B. No. 221 Page 41
As Introduced
fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide 1173
tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the 1174
remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in 1175
providing services to the school's students that assist in 1176
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1177
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1178
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1179
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1180
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1181
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1182
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1183
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1184
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1185
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1186
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1187
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1188
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1189
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1190
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1191
purpose. 1192
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1193
receives pursuant to section 4503.953 of the Revised Code to 1194
Gilmour academy located in the municipal corporation of Gates 1195
Mills. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1196
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1197
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1198
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1199
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1200
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1201
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1202
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1203

S. B. No. 221 Page 42
As Introduced
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1204
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1205
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1206
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1207
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1208
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1209
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1210
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1211
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1212
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1213
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1214
purpose. 1215
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1216
receives pursuant to section 4503.954 of the Revised Code to 1217
University school located in the suburban area near the 1218
municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty 1219
per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition 1220
assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining 1221
fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing 1222
services to the school's students that assist in developing or 1223
maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. 1224
The services provided may include bereavement counseling, 1225
instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity 1226
training, and the counseling and education of students regarding 1227
bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and 1228
human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the 1229
school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to 1230
receive training in providing those services. The school 1231
principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate 1232
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 1233
that the school hires to provide those services. The school 1234

S. B. No. 221 Page 43
As Introduced
shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt 1235
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 1236
Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the 1237
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 1238
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1239
receives pursuant to section 4503.955 of the Revised Code to 1240
Saint Albert the Great school located in North Royalton. The 1241
school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives 1242
to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall 1243
use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs 1244
in providing services to the school's students that assist in 1245
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1246
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1247
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1248
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1249
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1250
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1251
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1252
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1253
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1254
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1255
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1256
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1257
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1258
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1259
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1260
purpose. 1261
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1262
receives pursuant to section 4503.956 of the Revised Code to the 1263
Liberty Center local school district, which shall use the 1264
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1265

S. B. No. 221 Page 44
As Introduced
related services. 1266
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1267
receives pursuant to section 4503.957 of the Revised Code to 1268
John F. Kennedy Catholic school located in Warren. The school 1269
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1270
purpose. 1271
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1272
receives pursuant to section 4503.958 of the Revised Code to 1273
Elder high school located in the municipal corporation of 1274
Cincinnati. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 1275
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 1276
students, twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit 1277
arts and enrichment at the school, and twenty-five per cent of 1278
the contributions to benefit athletics at the school. 1279
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1280
receives pursuant to section 4503.959 of the Revised Code to the 1281
Dublin food pantry, which shall use the contributions to provide 1282
food, hygiene products, and other resources to individuals and 1283
families experiencing food insecurity. 1284
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1285
receives pursuant to section 4503.961 of the Revised Code to 1286
Fairfield senior high school located in the municipal 1287
corporation of Fairfield. The high school shall not use the 1288
contributions for any political purpose. 1289
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1290
receives pursuant to section 4503.962 of the Revised Code to 1291
Hamilton high school located in the municipal corporation of 1292
Hamilton. The high school shall not use the contributions for 1293
any political purpose. 1294

S. B. No. 221 Page 45
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1295
receives pursuant to section 4503.963 of the Revised Code to 1296
Ross high school located in Ross township in Butler county. The 1297
high school shall not use the contributions for any political 1298
purpose. 1299
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1300
receives pursuant to section 4503.964 of the Revised Code to 1301
Chardon hilltopper gridiron club. The club shall use 1302
contributions to fund college and career technical training 1303
scholarships for students. 1304
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1305
receives pursuant to section 4503.965 of the Revised Code to the 1306
Norton music boosters association. The association shall use the 1307
contributions to provide financial assistance to the Norton high 1308
school music boosters for equipment, travel, and programming 1309
expenses. 1310
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1311
receives pursuant to section 4503.97 of the Revised Code to the 1312
friends of united Hatzalah of Israel, which shall use the money 1313
to support united Hatzalah of Israel, which provides free 1314
emergency medical first response throughout Israel. 1315
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1316
receives pursuant to section 4503.98 of the Revised Code to the 1317
Westerville parks foundation to support the programs and 1318
activities of the foundation and its mission of pursuing the 1319
city of Westerville's vision of becoming "A City Within A Park." 1320
(C) All investment earnings of the license plate 1321
contribution fund shall be credited to the fund. Not later than 1322
the first day of May of every year, the registrar shall 1323

S. B. No. 221 Page 46
As Introduced
distribute to each entity described in division (B) of this 1324
section the investment income the fund earned the previous 1325
calendar year. The amount of such a distribution paid to an 1326
entity shall be proportionate to the amount of money the entity 1327
received from the fund during the previous calendar year. 1328
Sec. 4503.59. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger 1329
car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other 1330
vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles 1331
may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle 1332
and issuance of "Equality Ohio" license plates. The application 1333
may be combined with a request for a special reserved license 1334
plate under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon 1335
receipt of the completed application and compliance by the 1336
applicant with divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the 1337
registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle 1338
registration and a set of "Equality Ohio" license plates and a 1339
validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required 1340
by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. 1341
In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily 1342
inscribed on the license plates, "Equality Ohio" license plates 1343
shall display an appropriate logo and words that are selected by 1344
representatives of the equality Ohio and approved by the 1345
registrar. "Equality Ohio" license plates shall display county 1346
identification stickers that identify the county of registration 1347
as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. 1348
(B) "Equality Ohio" license plates and a validation 1349
sticker, or validation sticker alone, shall be issued upon 1350
receipt of an application for registration of a motor vehicle 1351
under this section; payment of the regular license tax as 1352
prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any 1353

S. B. No. 221 Page 47
As Introduced
applicable motor vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. 1354
of the Revised Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by 1355
section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, an additional 1356
administrative fee of ten dollars, and a contribution as 1357
provided in division (C)(1) of this section; and compliance with 1358
all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor 1359
vehicles. 1360
(C)(1) For each application for registration and 1361
registration renewal notice the registrar receives under this 1362
section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of fifteen 1363
dollars. The registrar shall deposit this contribution into the 1364
state treasury to the credit of the license plate contribution 1365
fund created in section 4501.21 of the Revised Code. 1366
(2) The registrar shall deposit the administrative fee of 1367
ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau of 1368
motor vehicles for additional services required in the issuing 1369
of "Equality Ohio" license plates, into the state treasury to 1370
the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created 1371
in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 1372
Section 2. That existing section 4501.21 of the Revised 1373
Code is hereby repealed. 1374
Section 3. Section 4501.21 of the Revised Code is 1375
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 1376
by H.B. 74, H.B. 110, H.B. 281, H.B. 291, and H.B. 578, all of 1377
the 134th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the 1378
principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised 1379
Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable 1380
of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the 1381
resulting version of the section in effect prior to the 1382
effective date of the section as presented in this act. 1383